src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
# Adjective inflection
The adjectives are inflected like regular nouns. The only morphological
difference in adjectives compared to other nouns is higher likelihood of
comparative derivations–they are fully productive. For adjectives that do
not compare, use qualifiers classification instead.
VISK § 300

## Adjective stem variation and allomorph selection
Adjective stems are formed like noun stems, with similar patterns. Adjectives
have additionally the productive comparative derivations, which may have
their own stems, particularly an e-stem for a-stem words. The examples in
this chapter are the same set of cases as with nouns:
singular nominative, singular essive, singular inessive, plural essive,
plural elative, singular partitives, singular illatives, plural partitives
plural genitives, plural illatives and the compound forms. And also the
comparative derivations: comparative singular nominative and superlative
singular nominative. Majority of adjeciteves are equivalent to
corresponding noun classes, so some examples have been omitted.

### Bisyllabic / derivational adjective stems without stem variation
The most basic adjective stems do not have any stem internal variation.
They end in o, u, y or ö, and with some limited set of new words, e.
This class has the fewest allomorphs. There are a number of productive
adjective classes in this section, including all lexicalised nut 
participle’s passives (-tu, -ty), moderative derivations (-hko, -hkö)
and ...
Examples follow in specific sub-classes.

The words in this class ending in o belong to `ADJ_TUMMAHKO`, the old
dictionaries use class ¹. The stems should be entered in dictionary like:
```tummahko+A:tummahko A_TUMMAHKO  ;```
This class includes back vowel moderative
derivations. N.B. the comparative derivation of moderatives is semantically
awkward, but morphologically plausible.

* Adjectives 1 o examples:*
* *tummahko:* `tummahko+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # darkish)
* *tummahkona:* `tummahko+A+Sg+Ess`
* *tummahkossa:* `tummahko+A+Sg+Ine`
* *tummahkoina:* `tummahko+A+Pl+Ess`
* *tummahkoissa:* `tummahko+A+Pl+Ine`
* *tummahkoa:* `tummahko+A+Sg+Par`
* ★*tummahkota:* `tummahko+A+Sg+Par` (is not standard language)
* *tummahkoon:* `tummahko+A+Sg+Ill`
* ★*tummahkohon:* `tummahko+A+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* ★*tummahkoseen:* `tummahko+A+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* *tummahkoja:* `tummahko+A+Pl+Par`
* ★*tummahkoita:* `tummahko+A+Pl+Par` (is not standard language)
* *tummahkojen:* `tummahko+A+Pl+Gen`
* ★*tummahkoiden:* `tummahko+A+Pl+Gen` (is not standard language)
* ★*tummahkoitten:* `tummahko+A+Pl+Gen` (is not standard language)
* *tummahkoihin:* `tummahko+A+Pl+Ill`
* ★*tummahkoisiin:* `tummahko+A+Pl+Ill` (is not standard language)
* *tummahkompi:* `tummahko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *tummahkoin:* `tummahko+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The stems ending in u are in class `ADJ_VALKAISTU`, and in old dictionaries
the class is ¹. These stems should be entered in dictionary like:
```valkaistu+A:valkaistu A_VALKAISTU  ;```
Common part of this class is formed by nut participle 
passive’s _back_ vowel versions after s stem verbs:

* Adjectives 1 u examples:*
* *valkaistu:* `valkaistu+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # bleached)
* *valkaistua:* `valkaistu+A+Sg+Par`
* *valkaistuun:* `valkaistu+A+Sg+Ill`
* *valkaistuna:* `valkaistu+A+Sg+Ess`
* *valkaistussa:* `valkaistu+A+Sg+Ine`
* *valkaistuja:* `valkaistu+A+Pl+Par`
* *valkaistujen:* `valkaistu+A+Pl+Gen`
* *valkaistuihin:* `valkaistu+A+Pl+Ill`
* *valkaistuina:* `valkaistu+A+Pl+Ess`
* *valkaistuissa:* `valkaistu+A+Pl+Ine`
* *valkaistumpi:* `valkaistu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *valkaistuin:* `valkaistu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The stems ending in y are in class `ADJ_HÄPÄISTY`, and in old dictionaries
the class is ¹. Common part of this class is formed by nut participle 
passive’s _front_ vowel versions after s stem verbs:

* Adjectives 1 y examples:*
* *häpäisty:* `häpäisty+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # defiled)
* *häpäistyä:* `häpäisty+A+Sg+Par`
* *häpäistyyn:* `häpäisty+A+Sg+Ill`
* *häpäistynä:* `häpäisty+A+Sg+Ess`
* *häpäistyssä:* `häpäisty+A+Sg+Ine`
* *häpäistyjä:* `häpäisty+A+Pl+Par`
* *häpäistyjen:* `häpäisty+A+Pl+Gen`
* *häpäistyihin:* `häpäisty+A+Pl+Ill`
* *häpäistyinä:* `häpäisty+A+Pl+Ess`
* *häpäistyissä:* `häpäisty+A+Pl+Ine`
* *häpäistympi:* `häpäisty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *häpäistyin:* `häpäisty+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The words in this class ending in ö belong to `ADJ_HÖLÖ`, the old
dictionaries use class ¹. This class includes front vowel moderative
derivations.

* Adjectives 1 ö examples:*
* *hölö:* `hölö+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # blabbermouth)
* *hölöä:* `hölö+A+Sg+Par`
* *hölöön:* `hölö+A+Sg+Ill`
* *hölönä:* `hölö+A+Sg+Ess`
* *hölössä:* `hölö+A+Sg+Ine`
* *hölöjä:* `hölö+A+Pl+Par`
* *hölöjen:* `hölö+A+Pl+Gen`
* *hölöihin:* `hölö+A+Pl+Ill`
* *hölöinä:* `hölö+A+Pl+Ess`
* *hölöissä:* `hölö+A+Pl+Ine`
* *hölömpi:* `hölö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *hölöin:* `hölö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The new words with e stem have same allomorph selection as old short
unchanging bisyllabic u, y, o and ö stems, and no stem-internal variation.
The classification for the back vowel variant of this class is
`ADJ_TOOPE`, and old dictionaries used the class ⁸.

* Adjectives 8 back examples:*
* *toope:* `toope+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # doofus)
* *toopea:* `toope+A+Sg+Par`
* *toopeen:* `toope+A+Sg+Ill`
* *toopeja:* `toope+A+Pl+Par`
* *toopejen:* `toope+A+Pl+Gen`
* *toopeihin:* `toope+A+Pl+Ill`
* *toopempi:* `toope+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *toopein:* `toope+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`
They also have slightly greater probability for archaic form of plural
genitive:
* *toopein:* `toope+A+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare`

The front variation of unchanging e stems is class `@LEXNAME`, and in
old dictionaries ⁸.

* Adjectives 8 front examples:*
* *beige:* `beige+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # beige)
* *beigeä:* `beige+A+Sg+Par`
* *beigeen:* `beige+A+Sg+Ill`
* *beigejä:* `beige+A+Pl+Par`
* *beigejen:* `beige+A+Pl+Gen`
* *beigeihin:* `beige+A+Pl+Ill`
* *beigempi:* `beige+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *beigein:* `beige+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

### Trisyllabic and longer non-derived adjectuve stems
The trisyllabic and longer words with stem vowels o, u, y and ö also
have no stem variation either, but selection of suffix allomorphs for 
plural genitives and partitives is wider than for bisyllabic and derived
ones.

The o final trisyllabic stems are in class `ADJ_KOHELO`, and the old
dictionaries used ². 

* Adjectives 2 o examples:*
* *tohelo:* `tohelo+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # clumsy)
* *toheloita:* `tohelo+A+Pl+Par`
* *toheloja:* `tohelo+A+Pl+Par`
* *tohelojen:* `tohelo+A+Pl+Gen`
* *toheloiden:* `tohelo+A+Pl+Gen`
* *toheloitten:* `tohelo+A+Pl+Gen`
* *tohelompi:* `tohelo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *toheloin:* `tohelo+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

And the trisyllabic ö stem is classified `ADJ_LÖPERÖ`.

* Adjectives 2 ö examples:*
* *löperö:* `löperö+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # sloppy)
* *löperöjen:* `löperö+A+Pl+Gen`
* *löperöiden:* `löperö+A+Pl+Gen`
* *löperöitten:* `löperö+A+Pl+Gen`
* *löperömpi:* `löperö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *löperöin:* `löperö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

### Unchanging long vowel stems
The words with stem vowels o, u, y and ö preceded by vowels still have no
stem variation, but use yet another pattern of allomorphs for
singular and plural partitives and plural genitive

The class for o final long vowel stems is `ADJ_AUTIO`, and old
old dictionaries used ³. 

* Adjectives 3 o examples:*
* *autio:* `autio+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # deserted)
* *autiota:* `autio+A+Sg+Par`
* ★*autioa:* `autio+A+Sg+Par` (is not standard language)
* *autioita:* `autio+A+Pl+Par`
* *autioiden:* `autio+A+Pl+Gen`
* *autioitten:* `autio+A+Pl+Gen`
* *autiompi:* `autio+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *autioin:* `autio+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The front voweled stems with ö after vowels go to class `ADJ_RIIVIÖ`,
and used the old dictionary class ³.

* Adjectives 3 ö examples:*
* *riiviö:* `riiviö+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # nasty)
* *riiviötä:* `riiviö+A+Sg+Par`
* *riiviöiden:* `riiviö+A+Pl+Gen`
* *riiviöitten:* `riiviö+A+Pl+Gen`
* *riiviömpi:* `riiviö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *riiviöin:* `riiviö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

There are no examples of new loan word adjectives ending in long vowel
Furthermore there are no examples of adjectives in other classes without
stem variation yet. There are some examples of these in nouns if you need
new classes at some point.

The abovementioned o, u, y and ö stems as well as new e stems can all
form combinations with gradation feature as well. Not all combinations are
yet found for adjectives, for full reference, read the noun classes.

The quantitative k gradations with o bisyllabic o stem use class
`ADJ_KOLKKO`, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.

* Adjective gradations 1 k~0 o examples:*
* *kolkko:* `kolkko+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # gloomy)
* *kolkossa:* `kolkko+A+Sg+Ine`
* *kolkoista:* `kolkko+A+Pl+Ela`
* *kolkkoihin:* `kolkko+A+Pl+Ill`
* *kolkompi:* `kolkko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *kolkoin:* `kolkko+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative k gradations with u bisyllabic o stem use class
`ADJ_VIRKKU`, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.

* Adjective gradations 1 k~0 u examples:*
* *virkku:* `virkku+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ???)
* *virkussa:* `virkku+A+Sg+Ine`
* *virkuista:* `virkku+A+Pl+Ela`
* *virkkuihin:* `virkku+A+Pl+Ill`
* *virkumpi:* `virkku+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *virkuin:* `virkku+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative k gradations with y bisyllabic o stem use class
`ADJ_SÄIKKY`, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.

* Adjective gradations 1 k~0 y examples:*
* *säikky:* `säikky+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ???)
* *säikyssä:* `säikky+A+Sg+Ine`
* *säikyistä:* `säikky+A+Pl+Ela`
* *säikkyihin:* `säikky+A+Pl+Ill`
* *säikympi:* `säikky+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *säikyin:* `säikky+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative k gradations with o bisyllabic ö stem use class
`ADJ_KÖKKÖ`, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.

* Adjective gradations 1 k~0 ö examples:*
* *kökkö:* `kökkö+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ???)
* *kökössä:* `kökkö+A+Sg+Ine`
* *kököistä:* `kökkö+A+Pl+Ela`
* *kökköihin:* `kökkö+A+Pl+Ill`
* *kökömpi:* `kökkö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *kököin:* `kökkö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

there is no unvarying e final adjective with _k ~ 0_ gradation.

The quantitative gradation of p before o is in class `ADJ_SUIPPO` and
old dictionaries would use ¹⁻B.

* Adjective gradations 1 p~0 o examples:*
* *suippo:* `suippo+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ?)
* *suipossa:* `suippo+A+Sg+Ine`
* *suipoista:* `suippo+A+Pl+Ela`
* *suippoihin:* `suippo+A+Pl+Ill`
* *suipompi:* `suippo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *suipoin:* `suippo+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of p before u is in class `ADJ_IKÄLOPPU` and
old dictionaries would use ¹⁻B.
It is only a nominal compound based adjective that ends in u and has
p ~ 0 gradation here:

* Adjective gradations 1 p~0 u examples:*
* *ikäloppu:* `ikäloppu+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # age-old)
* *ikälopussa:* `ikäloppu+A+Sg+Ine`
* *ikälopuista:* `ikäloppu+A+Pl+Ela`
* *ikäloppuihin:* `ikäloppu+A+Pl+Ill`
* *ikälopumpi:* `ikäloppu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *ikälopuin:* `ikäloppu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

and none of the adjectives end in y and quantitative p gradation.

The quantitative gradation of p before ö is in class `ADJ_LÖRPPÖ` and
old dictionaries would use ¹⁻B.

* Adjective gradations 1 p~0 ö examples:*
* *lörppö:* `lörppö+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # blabbermouth)
* *lörpössä:* `lörppö+A+Sg+Ine`
* *lörpöistä:* `lörppö+A+Pl+Ela`
* *lörppöihin:* `lörppö+A+Pl+Ill`
* *lörpömpi:* `lörppö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *lörpöin:* `lörppö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of t before o is in class `ADJ_VELTTO`, 
which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary.

* Adjective gradations 1 t~0 o examples:*
* *veltto:* `veltto+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # lazy)
* *veltossa:* `veltto+A+Sg+Ine`
* *veltoista:* `veltto+A+Pl+Ela`
* *velttoihin:* `veltto+A+Pl+Ill`
* *veltompi:* `veltto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *veltoin:* `veltto+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of t before u is in class `ADJ_VIMMATTU`, 
which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary. 
The u stems with quantitative t gradation are commonest with nut participle
passive derivation’s back form (-ttu).
